California statutes. Water Code
Instead of proceeding under the next preceding section a subsequent reassessment of the tract may be made separately for the purpose of charging the land with its proper proportion of the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8769.

In case of any change of county boundary lines or creation of any new county, all acts and proceedings provided for in this chapter relating to any assessment upon land affected by the change of county boundary lines, or creation of the new county, shall be done as if the land was situated in the same county as at the time of appointment of the assessors to make the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8770.

The board has no power or authority to levy any assessment for any purpose upon property outside of the boundaries of the drainage district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8771.

Assessments shall be numbered consecutively.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8772.

The Reclamation Board shall, by resolution entered in its minutes, order the release of the lien and abandonment of the charges against tracts assessed and owned by the United States, State, counties, cities, school districts, reclamation districts, or similar other public agency, but not against any tracts deeded to the State, counties, cities, or districts for delinquent taxes or assessments. A copy of the resolution, certified by the secretary of the board and attested by its seal, shall be filed in the office of the county treasurer of each county wherein such land is situated as evidence of the release and abandonment of said charges against said lands.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 189.)
-------------------------------------------

8773.

In pursuance to Section 8765, the Reclamation Board, after June 30, 1946, shall take no action except in accordance with a judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction to cause warrants to be issued for such readjustment of Feather River Assessment No. 7 and any action or proceeding brought by any party to cause payment of such adjustment must be commenced before January 1, 1947, and after June 30, 1948, all moneys remaining in Feather River Assessment No. 7 Fund shall revert to the General Fund of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------

8774.

In pursuance to Section 8765, the Reclamation Board, after June 30, 1946, shall take no action except in accordance with a judgment of a court of competent jurisdiction to cause warrants to be issued for such readjustment of Hood Levee Assessment No. 8 and any action or proceeding brought by any party to cause payment of such adjustment must be commenced before January 1, 1947, and after June 30, 1948, all moneys remaining in Hood Levee Assessment No. 8 Fund shall revert to the General Fund of the State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 235.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Assessors and Assessment [8775. - 8790.]

8775.

When an assessment is to be levied, the board shall appoint three assessors.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8776.

The assessors shall be disinterested persons, and shall have no interest in any real estate within the drainage district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8777.

Each assessor before entering upon his duties, shall make and subscribe an oath that he is not in any manner interested in any real estate within the drainage district, and that he will perform the duties of an assessor to the best of his ability.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8778.

The compensation of assessors shall be fixed and allowed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8779.

After the assessors have examined the plan or plans of the works contemplated and the estimates of the cost, they shall make a preliminary report to the board indicating the exterior boundaries of the land that in their opinion will be benefited by the expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8780.

The assessors, after performing their duties pursuant to Section 8779, shall appoint a time and place in each county in which any of the land proposed to be assessed is situated, when and where they will hear objections to the report and evidence concerning the manner in which the assessment shall be apportioned.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8781.

The assessors shall give notice of the hearing in each of the counties by publication in a newspaper published in the county once a week for three weeks, the first publication to be not later than the twenty-first day before the day of hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8782.

The notice shall contain a general designation of the land which will in the assessors’ opinion be benefited, and shall refer to the preliminary report on file in the office of the board for the exterior boundaries.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8783.

The assessors, may amend, modify or change the exterior boundaries of the land that, in their opinion, will be benefited by such expenditures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8784.

The board shall levy an assessment pursuant to this chapter if, within six months after the completion of the hearings there is filed with the board, written consent to the contemplated project, signed and acknowledged by the following:

(a) Owners of land representing 66 per cent or more of the value of the land excluding improvements within the district, as described in the preliminary report of the appraisers, or as modified thereafter, as such value is shown by the last preceding county tax assessment roll of the county in which the land is situated.

(b) Sixty-six per cent or more of the owners of land within the district as described in the preliminary report, or as modified thereafter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8785.

If consent in writing is not filed in the manner and at the time provided, no further expenditures for the project shall be made, nor shall any obligations be incurred therefor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8786.

If consent is not filed the board may cause an assessment to be levied in the manner provided in this chapter for the purpose of paying the necessary engineering and other expenses in preparing the plans for the project, in making the preliminary report of the assessors and in holding the hearings thereon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8787.

The assessors shall assess upon the lands within the drainage district proposed to be assessed for the plans adopted by the board the sums included in the estimates of the board, and shall apportion the sums according to the benefits that will accrue to each tract of land in the drainage district affected by any particular project or unit by reason of the expenditure.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8788.

The assessors in apportioning the assessment on each tract of land shall, as information for the board set out, opposite each sum assessed for each particular tract of land, in separate columns respectively, the amount that they determine that each tract is so assessed by reason of benefit from the flood control features of the works involved in the plans, and also the amount that they deem each tract of land is so assessed by reason of all other benefit from the works.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8789.

The assessors shall, in the case of all assessments of the drainage district which may hereafter be levied by the board and all assessments which have heretofore been commenced but on which the assessment lists have not been made to conform with the decision of the board after equalization hearings held pursuant to the provisions of this part, state, as information for the board, in addition to the amount assessed by reason of the flood control features, opposite each sum assessed for each particular tract of land, in a separate column, the amount that they determine each tract is so assessed by reason of the severance of any lands not included in the assessed area which would have been included but for the location of a by-pass channel or channels provided for by another separate portion or project of the drainage district, adopted by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8790.

The amounts stated and placed opposite each assessment shall be no part of the assessment and shall in no way affect the assessment charged against each tract of land as the same may be fixed, but shall be subject to review and readjustment in the same manner as the assessment itself.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Reapportionment of Assessments [8795. - 8805.]

8795.

Whenever any tract of land upon which an assessment has been made, including assessments which have been bonded under and pursuant to the provisions of Part 5 of this division, is subdivided into smaller parcels, the board shall at any time, after the list has been certified by the secretary of the board to be correct and deposited as provided in this chapter, reapportion the assessment or assessments upon the tract, including assessments or portions thereof which have become delinquent together with the delinquencies thereon including penalties and interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8796.

Assessments and delinquencies on tracts of land which have become delinquent and which have been sold for delinquency pursuant to the provisions of this part and of Part 5 of this division, or either, and which have been subdivided, shall be reapportioned in the same manner and with the same effect as if the tract had not been so sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8797.

Whenever application is made to the board for reapportionment, the board shall reapportion the assessment upon the tract or tracts in such manner as in their judgment will charge each of the smaller tracts with a just proportion of the assessment made upon the tract so subdivided, and with a just proportion of the delinquencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8798.

Before the reapportionment becomes final, the board shall appoint a time when it will meet for the purpose of hearing objections to the reapportionment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8799.

Notice of the hearing shall be given by publication for two weeks in some newspaper of general circulation published in the county in which the land or some portion thereof is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8800.

The notice need not describe the land with particularity, but it is sufficient to describe the tract or tracts of land subdivided as a tract or tracts assessed to the owner or owners giving his name or other names upon the assessment list.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8801.

As many tracts may be embraced in one application as applicant is the owner of, or interested in.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8802.

At the time appointed, or such other time to which the hearing may be postponed, or which may be appointed by the board, the board shall hear any objections to the reapportionment and shall approve, modify, or alter the reapportionment in such manner as in their judgment will charge each of the smaller parcels with a just proportion of the assessment made upon the tract subdivided and shall enter an order on its minutes accordingly.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8803.

When the reapportionment has been made by the board, it shall deposit, in the office of the county treasurer of the county in which the land is situated, a list or lists of the charges assessed against each of the parcels, and the lists, after filing, shall have the same effect as an original assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8804.

The filing of the lists shall be conclusive evidence that the requisite notice has been given, and that all acts required to be done before the filing of the lists have been duly done and performed, and the decision of the board is final and conclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8805.

The expenses of publication and such other expenses as the board may order shall be borne and paid by the applicant.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Assessment Lists [8810. - 8833.]

8810.

The assessors shall make a separate list of the lands assessed in each county pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8811.

The list shall contain a description of the tracts of land assessed by swamp land surveys, legal subdivisions, or other boundaries or references sufficient to identify the tracts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8812.

The list shall also contain the name of the owner, if known, or if unknown, that fact, and the amount of the charge assessed against each tract.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8813.

The name of the owner of land which is or is supposed to be the property of the estate of a deceased person in course of administration may be stated as estate of (such person, naming him), deceased.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8814.

When there are two or more owners or supposed owners of any tract of land, partly known and partly unknown, the assessment may be to the known owner or owners by name and to other owners unknown.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8815.

No mistake in the name of the owner, or supposed owner, of any real estate invalidates the assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8816.

In the assessment list for any county the assessors may use any abbreviation in common use in that county, without explanation thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8817.

The assessors may also in the assessment list for any county make use of other abbreviations, if a schedule and explanation thereof with reasonable certainty is, unless printed on each page of the assessment list, prefixed to the assessment list and a reference thereto written, printed or stamped on each page of the assessment list whereon any such abbreviation is used.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8818.

In case any land in the assessment list for any county is described in whole or in part by reference to a map, plat or survey, which is on file or of record in any public office, it is sufficient in the description to designate the map, plat or survey by name, number or other designation sufficient to identify it in a schedule of such maps, plats and surveys.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8819.

The schedule shall be prefixed to the assessment list and shall set forth with reasonable certainty where each such map, plat or survey may be found, and shall be referred to by a reference written, printed or stamped on each page of the assessment list whereon such method of description is relied upon.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8820.

The assessment lists when completed shall be filed with the secretary of the board and the secretary shall forward to the county treasurer of each county in which any land so assessed is situated, the assessment list for the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8821.

The assessment list shall be open for inspection by the public for at least 60 days.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8822.

The board shall appoint a time and place not less than 60 days after the assessment list has been filed with the county treasurer when and where it will meet in each county wherein any of the land assessed is situated for the purpose of hearing objections to the assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8823.

The notice of hearing in each county shall be filed with the county treasurer and published once a week for four weeks in some newspaper published in the affected county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8824.

At any time before or during the hearing any person interested in any land upon which any charge has been assessed, may file in the office of the board or with any member thereof, written objections to the assessment, stating the grounds of the objections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8825.

The statement shall be verified by the affidavit of the person objecting or some other person who is familiar with the facts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8826.

At the hearing, the board shall hear such evidence as may be offered touching the correctness of the assessment or the manner of its apportionment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8827.

The board may modify or amend the assessment, and may reapportion all or any part of the entire assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8828.

Unless the aggregate amount of the whole of the assessment is modified or amended by the board so as to cause a difference of more than 212 per cent greater or less than the original total amount of the assessment, it is deemed that the assessment has not been subsantially modified and no necessity shall exist for a reapportionment thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8829.

If the assessment is reapportioned the board shall give two weeks notice as provided in this article and proceed to hear objections in each county affected and shall then reconsider the assessment and make an order approving the assessment as finally fixed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8830.

The decision of the board shall be final, and thereafter the assessment list shall be conclusive evidence, except in the suit provided in this article, that the assessment has been levied and apportioned according to law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8831.

Any person interested in any land upon which any charge has been assessed, who is aggrieved by the decision of the board approving the assessment, may commence an action against the district in the superior court of the county in which the land or the greater part thereof is situated, to have the assessment upon such land modified or annulled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8832.

The action shall be commenced within 60 days after the board has approved the assessment and the assessment list for the county has been deposited in the office of the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8833.

This action shall have preference over all civil actions in fixing the time of trial.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Maps [8835. - 8846.]

8835.

As used in this article map means a map or maps prepared by the assessors appointed for any assessment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8836.

The assessors appointed for any assesssment may prepare or cause to be prepared a map for the whole or any part or parts of the land to be assessed with sufficient detail to indicate thereon and identify the several tracts of land to be separately assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8837.

Each of the separate tracts shall be designated on the map by a distinctive number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8838.

Each of the maps shall be inscribed and designated as “reclamation board assessment map No.____,” giving each map a distinctive number.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8839.

Any map may consist of any number of sheets attached together and designated as one map.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8840.

The map when approved by the board, shall be certified by the secretary of the board as having been so approved.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8841.

The approved map shall be filed for record in the office of the county recorder of the county wherein the land indicated on the map is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8842.

For the purpose of any assessment levied by the board, the assessment list for any county may, for the description of any tract of land indicated on any map, refer to the map and to the number by which the tract is designated on the map.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8843.

Any reference to a map and tract is a sufficient description of the tract for the purposes of an assessment list, and for the purposes of the notice of delinquent sale, certificate of sale and deed in pursuance of said sale, and all other proceedings based upon the assesssment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8844.

No provision of any other statute of this State relative to the filing or recording of maps in the office of the county recorder shall apply to the maps referred to in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8845.

The maps referred to in this article shall have no legal effect for any purpose except for the convenient reference to and description of the tract of land indicated thereon for the purposes of description of tracts of land by reference thereto in the matter of assessments levied by the board and acts and proceedings based thereon as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8846.

No fee shall be charged by any county recorder for the filing for record of any map as provided in this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Collection and Delinquencies [8850. - 8864.]

8850.

After the board has held the hearings in each county pursuant to this chapter and the assesssment lists have been made to conform with its decision, the lists shall be certified by the secretary of the board to be correct, and shall thereupon be filed in the offices of the county treasurers, respectively, of the several counties in which are situated any of the lands assessed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8851.

The county treasurer shall indorse upon the assesssment list the date and time to the hour and minute when it was filed in his office; and thereafter the assessment constitutes a lien upon the land so assessed in the county, and imparts notice to all subsequent purchasers or incumbrancers or any person acquiring any interest in or lien upon the land.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8852.

The assessment shall be paid to the respective county treasurers in one or more installments of such amounts, and at such time, respectively, as the board, from time to time, may, by order entered in its minutes, direct.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8853.

At any time within 30 days after the assessment list has been filed in the office of the county treasurer, the whole amount of the assessment upon any tract of land therein separately assessed may be paid in cash to the county treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8854.

The county treasurer shall issue his receipt and shall endorse the fact and date of the payment in full upon the assessment list, and thereupon the lien of the assessment upon the tract of land ceases.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8855.

No interest shall be charged on any assessment paid in full within this 30-day period.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8856.

All assessments not paid in full within the period of 30 days shall bear interest at the rate of 7 per cent per annum from and after the time when the assessment list is filed in the office of the county treasurer for collection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8857.

The remaining portion not yet ordered paid by the board of the assessment upon any tract of land may be voluntarily paid in full, with the accrued interest thereon, at any time after the lien of the assessment has accrued.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8858.

If any installment is unpaid at the expiration of 30 days from the date of the board order calling the installment, the installment is delinquent, together with accrued interest to date of delinquency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8859.

When any installment is delinquent, a penalty of 10 per cent of the amount of the installment plus interest, shall be added and collected for the use of the drainage district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8860.

If any action is pending in any court to have the assessment on any tract of land reviewed, modified or annulled, pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the assessment, if not annulled in the action, may, in the discretion of the board, become delinquent 30 days after any judgment rendered in the action has become final.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8861.

From date of delinquency until time of delinquent sale, the unpaid installment, together with added interest and penalty, bears interest at the rate of 7 per cent per annum.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8862.

When the installment is delinquent, the board, when it deems it advisable, shall publish in each county where the delinquency exists, a list in one notice of all delinquencies once a week for two weeks successively in some newspaper of general circulation published in the county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8863.

The notice shall contain:

(a) A description of the property assessed as described in the assessment list by reference number or by other descriptions sufficient to identify the property.

(b) The name of the owner to whom the property is assessed or a statement that the owners are unknown.

(c) The amount of the delinquent installment, interest and penalty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8864.

The notice shall also state that each of the parcels will be sold at public auction by the county treasurer in front of the courthouse of the county at a specified day and hour, to pay the installment with accrued interest and the penalty, together with its proportion of the total cost of publication of the notice of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Sale of Land for Delinquent Assessments [8870. - 8890.]

8870.

At the time and place stated in the notice of sale, or such other time to which the sale is postponed, the county treasurer shall sell each parcel of land described in the notice to the highest bidder for lawful money of the United States unless prior thereto he has received payment in full of the delinquent installment, interest, penalty and cost of publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8871.

If not completed on the first day the sale may be continued from day to day and over Sundays and legal holidays until completed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8872.

No license shall be required of the county treasurer for conducting the sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8873.

No bid for any parcel shall be accepted which is less than the aggregate sum then due for the installment thereon, together with accrued interest, penalty and cost of publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8874.

If no bid is made for any parcel at the delinquent sale which is equal to the total amount when due on the parcel, the county treasurer shall bid in and sell the parcel to the drainage district for the amount of the delinquent installment or installments, together with accrued interest, penalty and cost of publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8875.

The county treasurer shall execute to each purchaser at the delinquent sale, including the drainage district, a certificate of sale which shall be recorded by the purchaser in the county recorder’s office of the county in which the land is situated.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8876.

Out of the proceeds of the sales the county treasurer shall transmit to the State Treasurer the total amount then due on the property so sold as shown in the notice, and shall pay to the owner of the property any surplus remaining after the payment to the State Treasurer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8877.

The county treasurer shall, when directed by the board, postpone the delinquent sale from time to time for not less than 10 nor more than 30 days by a written notice posted at or near the place of sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8878.

The notice of postponement shall be substantially as follows: The sale of property for delinquent assessment under (name and number of assessment) of the Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District, which was fixed for (time and place of sale) has been postponed to (time to which postponed) at the same place.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8879.

Any person interested in any tract of land sold at the delinquent sale may redeem the tract at any time within one year after the date of sale by paying to the county treasurer for the purchaser a sum equal to the purchase price stated in the certificate of sale with interest thereon at the rate of 12 per cent per annum from the date of sale to the date of the redemption, together with the amount remaining due and unpaid of any installment upon any assessment on the land under the provisions of this part, with the penalty prescribed for delinquencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8880.

If no redemption is made within one year the board, upon demand and the surrender of the certificate of purchase and the delivery of a certificate of the county treasurer that no redemption has been made within the year from date of sale, shall execute to the purchaser, his heirs or assigns, a deed of conveyance of the parcel of land described in the certificate.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8881.

The deed conveys to the grantee the land free and clear of all encumbrances except State, county and municipal taxes, assessments levied or assessed by statutory authority and the unpaid balance of any assessment made by the drainage district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8882.

The unpaid balance of any assessment made by the drainage district, shall be called in and collected in the same manner as other assessments, except that no parcel sold and conveyed to the drainage district shall thereafter, until redeemed or until sold and disposed of by the board, be subject to sale by the treasurer for subsequent installments of any assessment made pursuant to the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8883.

Each deed by the board purporting to be executed under this chapter shall be prima facie evidence of the truth of the matters therein recited and of ownership by the grantee of the lands therein described.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8884.

All deeds required by this chapter to be executed by the board may be executed by the president and secretary thereof on behalf of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8885.

Any parcel of land bid in and purchased by the drainage district at the delinquent sale shall be held in trust for the assessment under which the parcel of land was sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8886.

The parcels of land specified in Section 8885 may be sold and conveyed by the board at any time after the expiration of the redemption period of one year at public or private sale and with or without notice, to any person paying not less than the amount for which the parcel was bid in by the county treasurer at the delinquent sale for the drainage district, with interest thereon at the rate of 12 percent per annum compounded yearly from the date of the delinquent sale, and also the amount of all subsequent installments or other assessments then delinquent, with accrued interest and penalties thereon.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 451.)
-------------------------------------------

8887.

Payment for the land purchased pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall be made in lawful money of the United States.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8888.

The board, when any land has been sold pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall execute a deed to the purchaser at the sale conveying the property, free of all encumbrances except State, county and other municipal taxes, assessments levied or assessed by statutory authority and the unpaid balance of all assessments of the drainage district, which balance shall be called in and collected in the same manner as other assessments.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8889.

When any lands purchased at the delinquent sale by the drainage district remain unsold then the board shall sell all such lands so held by the drainage district at public auction to the highest bidder for cash, upon two weeks published notice substantially in the manner provided for notice upon delinquent sales, and shall execute to the purchaser a conveyance, which deed shall convey title to the land as prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8890.

The proceeds of the sale shall be deposited with the State Treasurer to the credit of the assessment under which the property became delinquent.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Finances [8935. - 8991.]



  ARTICLE 3. Sacramento and San Joaquin Drainage District Refunding Act [8935. - 8946.]

8935.

The board shall cancel all proceedings taken in connection with the bond issue of the drainage district based upon and secured by Sutter-Butte By-pass assessment number six of the district now authorized but not sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8936.

The Controller shall request the State Treasurer to transfer and the Treasurer shall immediately transfer, any and all moneys deposited in the Bond Fund or Bond Interest Fund of the assessment from the fund or funds into the Construction Fund of the assessment to be used for the retirement of warrants pursuant to the provisions of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8937.

Immediately upon the bonds authorized and directed to be canceled by this article being canceled, the board may order that assessment number six shall be paid in semiannual installments equal to not less than 312 per cent of the principal of the assessment for each installment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8938.

If a supplementary assessment number six is levied by the board, immediately upon the supplementary assessment number six becoming a lien upon the lands, the board shall rescind and cancel its then existing order and the board may order that thereafter the assessment number six and the supplementary assessment number six shall be paid in semiannual installments equal to not less than 312 per cent of the principal amount of the assessment for each installment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8939.

Each of the semiannual installments upon each tract shall be based upon the original principal amount of the assessment on the tract less any deductions theretofore made by reason of any credits made upon the tract pursuant to the provisions of Chapter 556 of the Statutes of 1919, and shall continue to be so based until such time as the principal and interest of the assessment on the tract are paid in full.

(History: Added by Stats. 1943, Ch. 369.)
-------------------------------------------

8940.
